Utah statutes.
75-7-203.   Subject matter jurisdiction.

(1)  The district court has exclusive jurisdiction of proceedings in this state brought by a trustee or beneficiary concerning the administration of a trust.

(2)  The district court has concurrent jurisdiction with other courts of this state of other proceedings involving a trust.

(3)  This section does not preclude judicial or nonjudicial alternative dispute resolution.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

